Utah statutes.
26-18-8.   Enforcement of public assistance statutes.

(1)  The department shall enforce or contract for the enforcement of Sections 35A-1-503, 35A-3-108, 35A-3-110, 35A-3-111, 35A-3-112, and 35A-3-603 insofar as these sections pertain to benefits conferred or administered by the division under this chapter.

(2)  The department may contract for services covered in Section 35A-3-111 insofar as that section pertains to benefits conferred or administered by the division under this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 90, 2003 General Session

